Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.085

Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to transactions conducted by the following:

(1) Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(2) Vehicle wreckers, hulk haulers, and scrap processors licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW;

(3) Persons giving an allowance for the trade-in or exchange of secondhand property on the purchase of other merchandise of the same kind of greater value; and

(4) Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and beverage containers or metal or nonmetal junk, in compliance with chapter 19.290 RCW.

[ 2011 c 289 s 8; 2000 c 171 s 56; 1985 c 70 s 2; 1984 c 10 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.